District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.06

Establishment of the Financial Institutions Advisory Board.

There is established a Financial Institutions Advisory Board (“Board”). The function of the Board is advisory. The Board shall give the Commissioner sound and impartial advice on the following matters:

(1)

Applications by financial institutions, including international banking institutions, to become chartered or organized under the District of Columbia Banking Code;

(2)

Protection of the interests of depositors and shareholders in financial institutions operating in the District;

(3)

Protection of the interests of the general public related to the operation of financial institutions in the District;

(4)

Development and maintenance of a modern system of financial institutions in the District; and

(5)

Any other financial matter or matter concerning financial institutions operating in, or affecting, the District.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 106, 48 DCR 3244